Massachusetts, session 194th, S3154.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 43A of chapter 21 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (a) by inserting after the second sentence the 
following sentence:- 
“Combined sewer system overflow”, a discharge or release from a combined sewer 
system directly or indirectly into water bodies and waterways of the commonwealth. 
SECTION 2. Said Section 43A of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is further amended in 
subsection (a) by inserting after the sixth sentence the following sentence:-  
“Untreated combined sewer system overflow”, a discharge or release as a result of a 
combined sewer system overflow that is not treated through at least the removal of solids and 
treatment to deactivate bacteria.  
SECTION 3. Said section 43A of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after subsection (f) the following subsection:- 

of 3 13  (f½) (i) The department, in consultation with the department of public health, shall 
establish quality assurance project plan standards for the testing of water bodies and waterways 
for bacteria or other pollutants following a discharge from a permittee’s combined sewer system 
overflow outfall. 
(ii) Subject to appropriation, testing shall be conducted by the department or its designee, 
using the department’s quality assurance project plan, within a reasonable amount of time after a 
combined sewer system overflow notification as determined by the department based on the time 
elapsed since the combined sewer system overflow and the flow rate of the water body or 
waterway. Testing shall be conducted at multiple locations downstream from each combined 
sewer system overflow outfall. Testing may be suspended during the months of December to 
March, inclusive, based on weather conditions as determined by the department. 
(iii) Annually, not later than November 1, the department shall compile the data from 
each combined sewer system overflow and produce a report. The department, in consultation 
with the department of public health, shall use this data to create a predictive model for water 
quality following a combined sewer system overflow. The report and the water quality 
predictions shall be provided to the joint committee on environment and natural resources and 
the clerks of the senate and house of representatives. The department shall publish the report and 
the water quality predictions on its website. 
(iv) The department shall use the data compiled pursuant to paragraph (iii) to determine 
areas with high bacteria or pollutant content and shall require any permittee with bacteria content 
to develop a combined sewer system overflow mitigation plan, which shall be subject to 

of 3 34 approval by the department. Permittees with an approved combined sewer system overflow 
mitigation plan shall be prioritized in state storm water funding. 
SECTION 4. Said section 43A of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended in subsection (g) by striking out the first 2 paragraphs and inserting in place thereof the 
following paragraph:- 
The department shall: (i) require permittees to report to the department the volume of 
discharge from an outfall; (ii) assist permittees with installing accurate metering equipment to 
measure discharge from an outfall; and (iii) issue public advisories within the timeframes 
established by subsections (c) and (d). 
SECTION 5. Said section 43A of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended in subsection (k) by adding the following words:- Said regulations shall include: (i) a 
threshold for high bacteria or pollutant content; (ii) standards for the quality assurance project 
plan required by this section; and (iii) a definition of a 25-year, 24-hour storm event. 
SECTION 6. Said section 43A of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by adding the following subsection:- 
(l) There shall be no untreated combined sewer system overflow during or following a 
25-year, 24-hour storm event or smaller storm event in any of the Massachusetts Water 
Resources Authority sewer service areas. 
SECTION 7. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, shall take effect on January 1, 2027. 
SECTION 8. Section 5 shall take effect on January 1, 2028. 
SECTION 9. Section 6 shall take effect on January 1, 2030.